Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 2 UNIFORM DEBT-MANAGEMENT SERVICES ACT
5-19-235. Private enforcement.

If an individual voids an agreement pursuant to section 5-19-225 (b), the individual may recover in a civil action all money paid or deposited by or on behalf of the individual pursuant to the agreement, except amounts paid to creditors, in addition to the recovery under subsections (c)(3) and (c)(4) of this section.

If an individual voids an agreement pursuant to section 5-19-225 (a), the individual may recover in a civil action three times the total amount of the fees, charges, money, and payments made by the individual to the provider, in addition to the recovery under subsection (c)(4) of this section.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, an individual with respect to whom a provider violates this part 2 may recover in a civil action from the provider and any person that caused the violation:

Compensatory damages for injury, including noneconomic injury, caused by the violation;

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, with respect to a violation of section 5-19-217, 5-19-219 to 5-19-224, 5-19-227, or 5-19-228 (a), (b), or (d), the greater of the amount recoverable under subsection (c)(1) of this section or five thousand dollars;

Punitive damages; and

Reasonable attorney fees and costs.

In a class action, except for a violation of section 5-19-228 (a)(4), the minimum damages provided in subsection (c)(2) of this section do not apply.

In addition to the remedy available under subsection (c) of this section, if a provider violates an individual's rights under section 5-19-220, the individual may recover in a civil action all money paid or deposited by or on behalf of the individual pursuant to the agreement, except for amounts paid to creditors.

A provider is not liable under this section for a violation of this part 2 if the provider proves that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a good-faith error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the error. An error of legal judgment with respect to a provider's obligations under this part 2 is not a good-faith error. If, in connection with a violation, the provider has received more money than authorized by an agreement or this part 2, the defense provided by this subsection (f) is not available unless the provider refunds the excess within two business days after learning of the violation.

The administrator shall assist an individual in enforcing a judgment against the surety bond or other security provided under section 5-19-213 or 5-19-214.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1167, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-235 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-236. Violation of unfair or deceptive practices statute.

If an act or practice of a provider violates both this part 2 and section 6-1-105, an individual may not recover under both for the same act or practice.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1168, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-236 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-237. Statute of limitations.

An action or proceeding brought pursuant to section 5-19-233 (a), (b), or (c) shall be commenced within four years after the conduct that is the basis of the administrator's complaint.

An action brought pursuant to section 5-19-235 shall be commenced within two years after the latest of:

The individual's last transmission of money to a provider;

The individual's last transmission of money to a creditor at the direction of the provider;

The provider's last disbursement to a creditor of the individual;

The provider's last accounting to the individual pursuant to section 5-19-227 (a);

The date on which the individual discovered or reasonably should have discovered the facts giving rise to the individual's claim; or

Termination of actions or proceedings by the administrator with respect to a violation of this part 2.

The period prescribed in subsection (b)(5) of this section is tolled during any period during which the provider or, if different, the defendant has materially and willfully misrepresented information required by this part 2 to be disclosed to the individual, if the information so misrepresented is material to the establishment of the liability of the defendant under this part 2.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1168, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-237 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-238. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this part 2, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1169, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-238 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-239. Relation to federal "Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act".

This part 2 modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal "Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101 (c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 (c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103 (b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003 (b).

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1169, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-239 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-240. Transitional provisions - application to existing transactions.

Transactions entered into before January 1, 2008, and the rights, duties, and interests resulting from them may be completed, terminated, or enforced as required or permitted by a law amended, repealed, or modified by this part 2 as though the amendment, repeal, or modification had not occurred.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1169, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-240 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-241. Severability.

If any provision of this part 2 or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this part 2 that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this part 2 are severable.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1169, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-241 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-242. Repeal of part.

This part 2 is repealed, effective September 1, 2024. Prior to repeal, the department of regulatory agencies shall review the functions of the administrator pursuant to this part 2 and the registration of providers as provided for in section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1169, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-242 as it existed prior to 2017.